Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2608
Toll-free hotline for providers; established.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a statewide toll-free hotline to provide immediate responses to the needs of providers of programs. Such hotline may be operated by the department, or the department may contract with a state agency or with any other public or private entity capable of providing such service to operate the hotline.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 220;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 90.